Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3922
Relation to Electronic Signatures
in Global and National Commerce Act.

The Nebraska Uniform Adult Guardianship
and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act modifies, limits, and supersedes
the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15
U.S.C. 7001, as the act existed on January 1, 2011, but does not modify, limit,
or supersede section 101(c) of the act, 15 U.S.C. 7001(c), or authorize electronic
delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of the act, 15
U.S.C. 7003(b).

Laws 2011, LB157, § 26.